South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 1-23-115(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Upon written request by two members of the General Assembly, made before submission of a promulgated regulation to the General Assembly for legislative review, a regulation that has a substantial economic impact must have an assessment report prepared pursuant to this section and in accordance with the procedures contained in this article. In addition to any other method as may be provided by the General Assembly, the legislative committee to which the promulgated regulation has been referred, by majority vote, may send a written notification to the promulgating agency informing the agency that the committee cannot approve the promulgated regulation unless an assessment report is prepared and provided to the committee.  The written notification tolls the running of the one hundred-twenty-dayone-hundred-ten-day legislative review period, and the period does not begin to run again until an assessment report prepared in accordance with this article is submitted to the committee.  Upon receipt of the assessment report, additional days must be added to the days remaining in the one hundred-twenty-dayone-hundred-ten-day review period, if less than twenty days, to equal twenty days.  A copy of the assessment report must be provided to each member of the committee. SECTION 2.  Section 1-23-120(C) and (D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Upon receipt of the regulation, the President and Speaker shall refer the regulation for review to the standing committees of the Senate and House which are most concerned with the function of the promulgating agency. A copy of the regulation or a synopsis of the regulation must be given to each member of the committee, and Legislative Council shall notify all members of the General Assembly when regulations are submitted for review either through electronic means or by addition of this information to the website maintained by the Legislative Services Agency, or both. The committees to which regulations are referred have one hundred ten twenty days from the date regulations are submitted to the General Assembly to consider and take action on these regulations. However, if a regulation is referred to a committee and no action occurs in that committee on the regulation within sixty calendar days of receipt of the regulation, the regulation must be placed on the agenda of the full committee beginning with the next scheduled full committee meeting. (D) If a joint resolution to approve a regulation is not enacted within one hundred ten twenty days after the regulation is submitted to the General Assembly or if a joint resolution to disapprove a regulation has not been introduced by a standing committee to which the regulation was referred for review, the regulation is effective upon publication in the State Register. Upon introduction of the first joint resolution disapproving a regulation by a standing committee to which the regulation was referred for review, the one-hundred-twenty-dayone-hundred-ten-day legislative review period for automatic approval is tolled. A regulation may not be filed under the emergency provisions of Section 1-23-130 if a joint resolution to disapprove the regulation has been introduced by a standing committee to which the regulation was referred. Upon a negative vote by either the Senate or House of Representatives on the resolution disapproving the regulation and the notification in writing of the negative vote to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate by the Clerk of the house in which the negative vote occurred, the remainder of the period begins to run. If the remainder of the period is less than ninety days, additional days must be added to the remainder to equal ninety days. The introduction of a joint resolution by the committee of either house does not prevent the introduction of a joint resolution by the committee of the other house to either approve or disapprove the regulations concerned. A joint resolution approving or disapproving a regulation must include: (1) the synopsis of the regulation as required by subsection (B)(4); (2) the summary of the final assessment report prepared by the office pursuant to Section                  1-23-115 or, as required by subsection (B)(5), the statement or explanation that an assessment report is not required or is exempt. SECTION 3.  Section 1-23-120(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) The one-hundred-twenty-dayone-hundred-ten-day legislative review period of review begins on the date the regulation is filed with the President and Speaker. Sine die adjournment of the General Assembly tolls the running of the period of review, and the remainder of the period begins to run upon the next convening of the General Assembly excluding special sessions called by the GovernorThe legislative review period is tolled from the second Friday in May through the second Monday the following January. SECTION 4.  Section 1-23-120(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) Any member of the General Assembly may introduce a joint resolution approving or disapproving a regulation thirty days following the date the regulations concerned are referred to a standing committee for review and no committee joint resolution approving or disapproving the regulations has been introduced and the regulations concerned have not been withdrawn by the promulgating agency pursuant to Section 1-23-125, but the introduction does not toll the one-hundred-twenty-dayone-hundred-ten-day legislative review period of for automatic approval. SECTION 5.  Section 1-23-125(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The notification tolls the one-hundred-twenty-dayone-hundred-ten-day legislative review period for automatic approval, and when an agency withdraws regulations from the General Assembly prior to the time a committee resolution to approve or disapprove the regulation has been introduced, the remainder of the period begins to run only on the date the regulations are resubmitted to the General Assembly. Upon resubmission of the regulations, additional days must be added to the days remaining in the legislative review period for automatic approval, if less than twenty days, to equal twenty days, and a copy of the amended regulation must be given to each member of the committee. If an agency decides to take no action pursuant to subsection (B)(3), it shall notify the committee in writing, and the remainder of the period begins to run only upon this notification. SECTION 6.  The provisions of Chapter 23, Title 1, as amended by this act, are applicable to regulations filed with the President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives on and after January 14, 2025. SECTION 7.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----